Utah statutes.
31A-31-106.   Disciplinary action.

(1)  If, after giving notice and a hearing conducted pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the commissioner finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a person licensed under Title 31A has committed a fraudulent insurance act, the commissioner may suspend or revoke the license issued under Title 31A.

(2)  If the appropriate licensing authority finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a service provider violated Section 31A-31-103, the service provider is subject to revocation or suspension of the service provider's license.

(3)  The commissioner may notify the appropriate licensing authority of conduct by a service provider that the commissioner believes may constitute a fraudulent insurance act.

